Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1847.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1000.31 of Title 59, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Department of Human Services shall work with the Oklahoma
State Fire Marshal to develop guidelines that allow family child
care homes and large child care homes, as defined in Section 402 of
Title 10 of the Oklahoma Statutes, to operate under the requirements
of the 2018 International Residential Code as adopted by the
Oklahoma Uniform Building Code Commission (OUBCC). Family child
care homes and large child care homes shall not be denied a license
to operate should they comply with the requirements of the
guidelines as established by the Department and the Oklahoma State
Fire Marshal. No agency, municipality, county, or other political
subdivision of this state shall place stricter fire and life safety

requirements than those outlined in the 2018 International
Residential Code as adopted by the OUBCC on family child care homes
and large child care homes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1847 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 26th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1847 Page 3